Maine, session 132, LD2022.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §17001, sub-§3-A, as amended by PL 1993, c. 386, §1, is further
amended to read:
3-A. Annual base compensation. "Annual base compensation" means a member's
gross compensation, based upon amounts reported by the member's employer on the
member's earnable compensation in the previous year's federal wage and tax statement,
year that is used the first day of each April for setting the amount of coverage prior to
retirement for participants in the group life insurance program administered by the board,
except that, in a member's first year of hire or for a participant who is not a member, "annual
base compensation" means the expected annual earnable compensation of a participant as
reported by the participant's employer in a manner specified by the chief executive officer.
Page 1 - 132LR2784(02)